District of Columbia statutes.
29-709.04

Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall state with particularity:

(1)

The date and content of plaintiff’s demand and the general partners’ response to the demand; or

(2)

Why demand should be excused as futile.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1004 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).